Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1600XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 132 Section 1. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR MATERNITY CARE 1 INCLUDING DOULA CARE. 2 1. Under both fee-for-service and managed care 3 administration of Medicaid, the department of health and human 4 services shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A, amend any 5 contract with a managed care organization, and apply for any 6 Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver as may be necessary to 7 provide for maternity care including doula care. 8 2. The department of health and human services, in 9 collaboration with stakeholders, shall establish: 10 a. A process for a doula to be certified and enrolled as a 11 participating provider. 12 b. A reimbursement rate for doula services that supports a 13 livable annual income for a full-time practicing doula. 14 3. For the purposes of this section, âdoulaâ means a trained 15 professional who provides continuous physical, emotional, and 16 informational support to a pregnant person before, during, and 17 after childbirth to improve birth outcomes, prevent stillbirths 18 and infant deaths, and reduce maternal morbidity and mortality. 19